Alabama, session 2026rs, SB293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-10-2.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§13A-10-2.1
(a) As used in this section, the term "first responder"
means a law enforcement officer, firefighter, or emergency
medical services personnel.
Page 1

medical services personnel.
SB293 INTRODUCED
(b) A person commits the crime of interference with a
first responder if, after receiving instruction to not
approach or to vacate the area from a first responder engaged
in a lawful government function, the person: (i) approaches or
remains within 25 feet of the first responder, and (ii) does
any of the following:
(1) Impedes or interferes with the first responder's
ability to perform his or her duties.
(2) Threatens the first responder with physical harm.
(3) Strikes, shoves, kicks, or otherwise touches the
first responder, or subjects the first responder to physical
contact.
(d) Interference with a first responder is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(d) This section does not apply to the obstruction,
impairment, or hindrance of the making of an arrest.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2